North Carolina statutes. Chapter 108D. Medicaid and NC Health Choice Managed Care Programs.
Article 3. Managed Care Entity Provider Networks.

§ 108D-21.
LME/MCO provider networks.

Each LME/MCO operating the combined 1915(b) and (c) waivers shall develop and maintain a closed network of providers to furnish mental health, intellectual or developmental disabilities, and substance abuse services to its enrollees.

History.

2019-81, s. 1(a).

Editor’s Note.

Session Laws 2019-81, s. 1(b), provides: “This section is effective October 1, 2019, and applies to (i) appeals arising from local management entity/managed care organization (LME/MCO) notices of adverse benefit determination mailed on or after that date and (ii) grievances received by an LME/MCO on or after that date.”

§ 108D-22.
PHP provider networks.

Except as provided in

G.S. 108D-23

, each PHP shall develop and maintain a provider network that meets access to care requirements for its enrollees. A PHP may not exclude providers from their networks except for failure to meet objective quality standards or refusal to accept network rates. Notwithstanding the previous sentence, a PHP must include all providers in its geographical coverage area that are designated essential providers by the Department in accordance with subdivision (b) of this section, unless the Department approves an alternative arrangement for securing the types of services offered by the essential providers.

The Department shall designate Medicaid and NC Health Choice providers as essential providers if, within a region defined by a reasonable access standard, the provider either (i) offers services that are not available from any other provider in the region or (ii) provides a substantial share of the total units of a particular service utilized by Medicaid and NC Health Choice beneficiaries within the region during the last three years and the combined capacity of other service providers in the region is insufficient to meet the total needs of the Medicaid and NC Health Choice enrollees. The Department shall not classify physicians and other practitioners as essential providers. At a minimum, providers in the following categories shall be designated essential providers:

Federally qualified health centers.

Rural health centers.

Free clinics.

Local health departments.

State Veterans Homes.

History.

2019-81, s. 1(a).

Editor’s Note.

Session Laws 2019-81, s. 1(b), provides: “This section is effective October 1, 2019, and applies to (i) appeals arising from local management entity/managed care organization (LME/MCO) notices of adverse benefit determination mailed on or after that date and (ii) grievances received by an LME/MCO on or after that date.”

§ 108D-23.
BH IDD tailored plan networks.

Entities operating BH IDD tailored plans shall develop and maintain a closed network of providers only for the provision of behavioral health, intellectual and developmental disability, and traumatic brain injury services.

History.

2019-81, s. 1(a); 2021-62, s. 4.7(b).

Editor’s Note.

Session Laws 2019-81, s. 1(b), provides: “This section is effective October 1, 2019, and applies to (i) appeals arising from local management entity/managed care organization (LME/MCO) notices of adverse benefit determination mailed on or after that date and (ii) grievances received by an LME/MCO on or after that date.”

Effect of Amendments.

Session Laws 2021-62, s. 4.7(b), effective June 29, 2021, substituted “maintain a closed network of providers” for “maintain closed provider networks.”

§§ 108D-24 through 108D-29.

Reserved for future codification purposes.